Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 1. General Provisions
§ 17-18-114.
Remedies of secretary of state, offerors, target companies and equity security owners for violations of law.

Whenever it appears to the secretary of state that any person has engaged or is about to engage in any act or practice constituting a violation of any provision of this act or any rule or regulation or order adopted under this act, the secretary of state may investigate and issue orders and notices, including temporary ex parte cease and desist orders without notice. In addition to all other remedies, he may bring an action in any district court in the name and on behalf of the state of Wyoming against any person or persons participating in or about to participate in a violation of this act to enjoin those persons from continuing or doing any act in violation of this act or to enforce compliance with this act. In any court proceedings the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure shall apply.

Whenever it is reasonably believed that any person has engaged or is about to engage in any act or practice constituting a violation of this act or any regulation or order adopted under this act, the offeror, target company or any record or beneficial owner of an equity security of the target company may bring an action in the district court of the county where the target company has its principal office or Natrona county to enjoin that person from continuing or doing any act in violation of this act or to enforce compliance with this act.

Upon a proper showing, the court may grant a permanent or preliminary injunction or temporary restraining order or may order rescission of any sales, tenders for sale, purchases or tenders for purchase of equity securities determined to be unlawful under this act or any rule or regulation or order of the secretary of state. The court shall not require the secretary of state to post a bond.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 269, § 1.

Cross references. —

For Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure, see the

Wyoming Court Rules Annotated.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 17-18-102(b)(xx).

§ 17-18-115.
Judicial review.

An appeal may be taken by any offeror, target company, or other party to any proceeding before the secretary of state from any final order of the secretary of state by filing a petition for review within thirty (30) days after entry of the final order complained of pursuant to the provisions of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act (W.S.

16-3-101

through

16-3-115

).

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 269, § 1.

§ 17-18-116.
Proxies.

Any qualified corporation may in its articles of incorporation restrict or prohibit the use of proxies to vote shares. The restriction or prohibition may be effective for:

All meetings;

All meetings and issues with any specific exceptions the board of directors authorizes; or

Any meetings or any issues or both that the board of directors specifies.

The restriction or prohibitions on the use of proxies apply only to meetings including adjournments of meetings held within the state of Wyoming.

Notwithstanding any prohibition or restriction on the use of proxies, the beneficial owner of any shares entitled to vote shall always be entitled to vote the shares in person. If the beneficial owner of the shares is a minor or is incompetent, the shares may be voted in person by a trustee, a guardian, or a parent acting as trustee under the Wyoming Uniform Transfers to Minors Act [§§

34-13-114

through

34-13-137

] or a similar act. If the beneficial owner of the shares is an entity other than a natural person, the shares may be voted by any duly authorized officer of that entity.

Any restrictions imposed on persons who may be appointed to act as proxies shall not discriminate on their face in favor of management and against any shareholders opposed to management.

The board may restrict appointment as proxies to specific individuals designated by the corporation provided:

Shareholders are given the opportunity to give binding instructions as to how the shares are to be voted on any issues or in any elections that management is aware of at least thirty (30) days before it mails materials seeking proxies;

The corporation serves notice in writing on any shareholder who has requested in writing the notice within the past year of the deadline for submission of material on any issue that may arise at the meeting. The notice shall be given at least ten (10) days before the deadline;

The individuals designated for appointment as proxies agree to vote all valid proxies according to the shareholder instructions given; and

A meeting may not be adjourned sine die to prevent a vote on an issue if a quorum is present and the required majority either by proxy or in person has had an opportunity to indicate and has indicated an intention to vote against the recommendation of the board or management of the corporation on that issue.

If the articles of incorporation permit the board to impose restrictions on the use of proxies and a court orders a shareholder’s meeting, the board may still impose the restrictions provided if it does so within ten (10) days of the meeting or within half the total number of days between the date of the court order and the date of the meeting, whichever is less. The time periods for notice of issues and mailing deadlines set forth in subsection (e) of this section shall not apply to court ordered meetings.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 269, § 1; 2000, ch. 48, § 2; 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

in (f), substituted “subsection (e)” for “subsection (d).”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 17-18-117.
Voting indirectly owned shares.

Effective January 1, 1990, notwithstanding W.S. 17-16-721(b) a qualified corporation may elect to allow the voting of shares which are owned directly or indirectly by a second corporation, a majority of whose shares entitled to vote for directors of the second corporation are owned by the first corporation. The election shall be made in the articles of incorporation as amended. The number of such shares that may be voted is limited to forty percent (40%) of the total shares of that class outstanding.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 269, § 1.

§ 17-18-118.
Shareholder lists.

Notwithstanding W.S.

17-16-720

a qualified corporation in its bylaws may restrict access to the shareholder’s list to a period beginning two (2) days after the notice of the meeting for which the list was prepared or ten (10) days before the date of the meeting whichever is less.

A qualified corporation in its bylaws may deny shareholders the right to copy the list of shareholders prior to the meeting provided that:

Arrangements are made for an independent firm to provide to shareholders any information any stockholder wants to send them relative to the matters to be considered at the meeting provided the stockholder pays for the mailing and provides the material in a timely fashion; and

The list is made available at the shareholder’s expense to any shareholder at or after the meeting who is bringing a legal challenge to the right of any other shareholder to vote at the meeting; and

The list is available for inspection but not copying as provided by subsection (a) of this section and at the meeting. The making of handwritten copies by the shareholder or his attorney of the names and addresses of individual shareholders shall not be construed as copying within the meaning of this subsection.

A qualified corporation may take any other steps it deems reasonable or necessary to prevent the use of its shareholder lists for purposes not related to issues under consideration at a shareholder meeting.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 269, § 1.

§ 17-18-119.
Special meeting request exceptions.

Notwithstanding W.S.

17-16-702

and

17-16-703

a qualified corporation may in its bylaws:

Set a higher percentage of shares not to exceed fifty percent (50%) that must petition in order to call a special meeting than is provided by W.S.

17-16-702

;

Provide a longer period between the receipt of the request for a special meeting and the date that notice of the meeting is given than is allowed by W.S.

17-16-703

(a)(ii)(A);

Give the board discretion to require that the issues for which a special meeting is requested be considered instead at the next annual meeting if the request for the special meeting is made within a number of days of the annual meeting specified in the bylaws.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 269, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 17-18-120.
Annual meeting purposes.

In addition to the limitations on the matters that may be considered at annual meetings otherwise allowed by statute a qualified corporation may in its bylaws authorize the board to further limit the matters which an annual meeting may consider. The limitations shall not include elimination of the election of directors whose terms expire at the annual meeting. The limitations may take the form of excluding specified matters from consideration, allowing consideration of only certain specified matters, or requiring advance notice of the consideration of certain matters.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 269, § 1.

§ 17-18-121.
Action by less than a quorum.

Stockholders present or represented by proxy at an annual or special meeting of a qualified corporation at which a quorum is not present may take only the following actions:

Ratify or reject the independent auditors selected by the board if the corporation’s bylaws or articles of incorporation require approval of the auditors by a stockholder’s meeting;

With the consent of the officer presiding at the meeting, receive or hear any reports on the affairs of the corporation that may be presented;

Within the constraints of the time allowed on the agenda, ask questions concerning the affairs of the corporation of any officer or board member present;

Adjourn or recess the meeting to allow time to assemble a quorum, but they may not adjourn or recess to a different city and the total of all the adjournments and recesses may not exceed two (2) business days without the consent of the board of directors;

If a quorum is not present, may adjourn the meeting sine die, provided the motion to adjourn sine die shall not be in order until at least two (2) hours have passed since the time specified for the start of the meeting and the time at which the meeting was called to order.

If an annual meeting of a qualified corporation is adjourned sine die without achieving a quorum, the requirement of W.S.

17-16-701

to hold an annual meeting is satisfied. The board of directors may call a second annual meeting to take the place of the one adjourned without a quorum, but the board is not obligated to do so unless required to do so by the bylaws or articles of incorporation.

If a special meeting of a qualified corporation is adjourned sine die without achieving a quorum or without achieving the quorum necessary to do all or part of the business for which the meeting was required, the board of directors may call another special meeting, but is not obligated to do so unless required by the bylaws or articles of incorporation. The remedy of a stockholder aggrieved by a failure of the board to call another special meeting shall be to follow the procedures necessary for calling a new special meeting.

If different quorums are required for different matters, the absence of a quorum on one (1) issue shall not affect the ability of the meeting to act on other issues where a quorum is present.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 269, § 1.